Utah statutes.
58-22-306.   Admission criteria to take the Fundamentals of Engineering
Examination.
The admission criteria to take the NCEES Fundamentals of Engineering
Examination shall be enrollment in or graduation from one of the following
accredited curriculums, or other curriculums as may be established by rule by
the division in collaboration with the board:
(1)  EAC/ABET curriculum; or
(2)  TAC/ABET curriculum.
